North Carolina, session 2025, HB143.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Occupancy Tax. – (a) Authorization and Scope. – The Town of
Maysville Board of Commissioners may levy a room occupancy tax of up to six percent (6%) of
the gross receipts derived from the rental of an accommodation within the town that is subject to
sales tax imposed by the State under G.S. 105-164.4(a)(3). This tax is in addition to any State or
local sales tax.
SECTION 1.(b) Administration. – A tax levied under this section shall be levied,
administered, collected, and repealed as provided in G.S. 160A-215. The penalties provided in
G.S. 160A-215 apply to a tax levied under this section.
SECTION 1.(c) Distribution and Use of Tax Revenue. – The Town of Maysville
shall, on a quarterly basis, remit the net proceeds of the occupancy tax to the Maysville Tourism
Development Authority. The Authority shall use at least two-thirds of the funds to promote travel
and tourism and shall use the remainder for tourism-related expenditures in the town.
The following definitions apply in this subsection:
(1) Net proceeds. – Gross proceeds less the cost to the town of administering and
collecting the tax, as determined by the finance officer, not to exceed three
percent (3%) of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of gross
proceeds collected each year and one percent (1%) of the remaining gross
receipts collected each year.
(2) Promote travel and tourism. – To advertise or market an area or activity,
publish and distribute pamphlets and other materials, conduct market research,
or engage in similar promotional activities that attract tourists or business
travelers to the area. The term includes administrative expenses incurred in
engaging in the listed activities.
(3) Tourism-related expenditures. – Expenditures that, in the judgment of the
Tourism Development Authority, are designed to increase the use of
accommodations, meeting facilities, or convention facilities in the town or to
attract tourists or business travelers to the town. The term includes
tourism-related capital expenditures.
SECTION 2. Tourism Development Authority. – (a) Appointment and Membership.
– When the Town of Maysville Board of Commissioners adopts a resolution levying a room
occupancy tax under this act, it shall also adopt a resolution creating a town Tourism
*H143-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Development Authority, which shall be a public authority under the Local Government Budget
and Fiscal Control Act. The resolution shall provide for the membership of the Authority,
including the members' terms of office, and for the filling of vacancies on the Authority. At least
one-third of the members shall be individuals who are affiliated with businesses that collect tax
in the town, and at least one-half of the members shall be individuals who are currently active in
the promotion of travel and tourism in the town. The Town of Maysville Board of Commissioners
shall designate one member of the Authority as chair and shall determine the compensation, if
any, to be paid to members of the Authority.
The Authority shall meet at the call of the chair and shall adopt rules of procedure to
govern its meetings. The Finance Officer for the Town of Maysville shall be the ex officio finance
officer of the Authority.
SECTION 2.(b) Duties. – The Authority shall expend the net proceeds of the tax
levied under this act for promoting travel and tourism and for tourism-related expenditures as
provided in this act.
SECTION 2.(c) Reports. – The Authority shall report quarterly and at the close of
the fiscal year to the Town of Maysville Board of Commissioners on its receipts and expenditures
for the preceding quarter and for the year in such detail as the Board of Commissioners may
require.
SECTION 3. G.S. 160A-215(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) Applicability. – Subsection (c) of this section applies to all cities that levy an
occupancy tax. To the extent subsection (c) conflicts with any provision of a local act, subsection
(c) supersedes that provision. The remainder of this section applies only to Beech Mountain
District W, to the Cities of Belmont, Burlington, Conover, Eden, Elizabeth City, Gastonia,
Goldsboro, Graham, Greensboro, Hickory, High Point, Indian Trail, Jacksonville, Kings
Mountain, Lake Santeetlah, Lenoir, Lexington, Lincolnton, Lowell, Lumberton, Mebane,
Monroe, Mount Airy, Mount Holly, Reidsville, Roanoke Rapids, Salisbury, Sanford, Shelby,
Statesville, Washington, and Wilmington, to the Towns of Ahoskie, Beech Mountain, Benson,
Bermuda Run, Blowing Rock, Boiling Springs, Boone, Burgaw, Carolina Beach, Carrboro,
Cooleemee, Cramerton, Dallas, Dobson, Elkin, Elon, Fontana Dam, Four Oaks, Franklin, Grover,
Hillsborough, Jefferson, Jonesville, Kenly, Kure Beach, Lansing, Leland, Maysville,
McAdenville, Mocksville, Mooresville, Murfreesboro, North Topsail Beach, Pembroke, Pilot
Mountain, Ranlo, Robbinsville, Selma, Smithfield, St. James, St. Pauls, Swansboro, Troutman,
Tryon, West Jefferson, Wrightsville Beach, Yadkinville, Yanceyville, to the municipalities in
Avery and Brunswick Counties, to Clayton District C, Saluda District D, and Stallings District
S."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 143-First Edition